New York, session 2025-2026, A10564.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (a), (b) and (b-1) of subdivision 1 of section 2 8610 of the education law, paragraphs (a) and (b) as amended by chapter 3 186 of the laws of 2023 and paragraph (b-1) as added by chapter 227 of 4 the laws of 2019, are amended to read as follows: 5 (a) The department may issue a restricted license pursuant to which 6 the restricted licensee may receive a certificate to perform certain 7 examinations and procedures within the definition of clinical laboratory 8 technology set forth in subdivision one of section eighty-six hundred 9 one of this article, provided that such a restricted licensee may 10 perform examinations and procedures only in those of the following areas 11 which are specifically listed in [his or her] such licensee's certif- 12 icate: histocompatibility, cytogenetics, stem cell process, flow 13 cytometry/cellular immunology, molecular testing, and toxicology (under 14 paragraph [(b-1)] (b) of this subdivision) or for which the restricted 15 licensee has obtained a specialist certification from a nationally 16 recognized certifying body acceptable to the department. 17 (b) [Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subdivision, restricted 18 licensees employed at National Cancer Institute designated cancer 19 centers or at teaching hospitals that are eligible for distributions 20 pursuant to paragraph (c) of subdivision three of section twenty-eight 21 hundred seven-m of the public health law may receive a certificate that 22 also includes the practice of molecular testing including but not limit- 23 ed to genetic testing-molecular and molecular oncology, and restricted 24 licensees employed at national cancer institute designated cancer 25 centers may receive a certificate that includes the use of mass spectro- 26 metry or any tests and procedures acceptable to the commissioner of 27 health, in consultation with the commissioner, in the field of proteom- 28 ics, provided that such certificate holders may practice in such addi- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14781-02-6 A. 10564 2 1 tional areas only at such centers, teaching hospitals or other sites as 2 may be designated by the commissioner. 3 (b-1)] Only individuals employed in a laboratory authorized by the New 4 York state department of health [authorized] to perform toxicology 5 [laboratory] testing, operating under the direction of a clinical labo- 6 ratory director, may obtain a certificate in toxicology. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect twelve months after it shall have 8 become a law.